Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 246.54, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exceptions. new text begin (a)new text end Regardless of the facility to which the client is committed, subdivisions 1, 1a, 1b, and 1c, do not apply to the following individuals: (1) clients who are committed as sexual psychopathic personalities under section 253D.02, subdivision 15; and (2) clients who are committed as sexually dangerous persons under section 253D.02, subdivision 16. new text begin (b) A county that is classified as economically distressed is not responsible for the costs of care under this section. The executive board must classify a county as economically distressed if: new text end new text begin (1) more than 15 percent of the county's population is living in poverty, according to the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau; and new text end new text begin (2) more than 70 percent of the total acreage in the county is exempt from property taxation under chapter 272. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254B.03, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Division of costs. (a) Except for services provided by a county under section 254B.09, subdivision 1, or services provided under section 256B.69, the county shall, out of local money, pay the state for 22.95 percent of the cost of substance use disorder services, except for those services provided to persons enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 256B and room and board services under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1. Counties may use the indigent hospitalization levy for treatment and hospital payments made under this section. (b) 22.95 percent of any state collections from private or third-party pay, less 15 percent for the cost of payment and collections, must be distributed to the county that paid for a portion of the treatment under this section. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b), a county that is classified as economically distressed is not responsible for the county share of the cost of substance use disorder services. The commissioner must classify a county as economically distressed if: new text end new text begin (1) more than 15 percent of the county's population is living in poverty, according to the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau; and new text end new text begin (2) more than 70 percent of the total acreage in the county is exempt from property taxation under chapter 272. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256.043, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Appropriations from registration and license fee account. (a) The appropriations in paragraphs (b) to (n) shall be made from the registration and license fee account on a fiscal year basis in the order specified. (b) The appropriations specified in Laws 2019, chapter 63, article 3, section 1, paragraphs (b), (f), (g), and (h), as amended by Laws 2020, chapter 115, article 3, section 35, shall be made accordingly. (c) $100,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for grants for opiate antagonist distribution. Grantees may utilize funds for opioid overdose prevention, community asset mapping, education, and opiate antagonist distribution. (d) $2,000,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for direct payments to Tribal nations and five urban Indian communities for traditional healing practices for American Indians and to increase the capacity of culturally specific providers in the behavioral health workforce. Any evaluations of practices under this paragraph must be designed cooperatively by the commissioner and Tribal nations or urban Indian communities. The commissioner must not require recipients to provide the details of specific ceremonies or identities of healers. (e) $400,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for competitive grants for opioid-focused Project ECHO programs. (f) $277,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $321,000 each year thereafter is appropriated to the commissioner of human services to administer the funding distribution and reporting requirements in paragraph (o). (g) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 and deleted text begin $3,000,000deleted text end new text begin $2,000,000new text end each year thereafter is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for safe recovery sites start-up and capacity building grants under section 254B.18. (h) $395,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $415,000 each year thereafter is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for the opioid overdose surge alert system under section 245.891. (i) $300,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of management and budget for evaluation activities under section 256.042, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). (j) $261,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of human services for the provision of administrative services to the Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council and for the administration of the grants awarded under paragraph (n). (k) $126,000 is appropriated to the Board of Pharmacy for the collection of the registration fees under section 151.066. (l) $672,000 is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety for the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Of this amount, $384,000 is for drug scientists and lab supplies and $288,000 is for special agent positions focused on drug interdiction and drug trafficking. (m) After the appropriations in paragraphs (b) to (l) are made, 50 percent of the remaining amount is appropriated to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for distribution to county social service agencies and Tribal social service agency initiative projects authorized under section 256.01, subdivision 14b, to provide prevention and child protection services to children and families who are affected by addiction. The commissioner shall distribute this money proportionally to county social service agencies and Tribal social service agency initiative projects through a formula based on intake data from the previous three calendar years related to substance use and out-of-home placement episodes where parental drug abuse is a reason for the out-of-home placement. County social service agencies and Tribal social service agency initiative projects receiving funds from the opiate epidemic response fund must annually report to the commissioner on how the funds were used to provide prevention and child protection services, including measurable outcomes, as determined by the commissioner. County social service agencies and Tribal social service agency initiative projects must not use funds received under this paragraph to supplant current state or local funding received for child protection services for children and families who are affected by addiction. (n) After the appropriations in paragraphs (b) to (m) are made, the remaining amount in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of human services to award grants as specified by the Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council in accordance with section 256.042, unless otherwise appropriated by the legislature. (o) Beginning in fiscal year 2022 and each year thereafter, funds for county social service agencies and Tribal social service agency initiative projects under paragraph (m) and grant funds specified by the Opiate Epidemic Response Advisory Council under paragraph (n) may be distributed on a calendar year basis. (p) Notwithstanding section 16A.28, subdivision 3, funds appropriated in paragraphs (c), (d), (e), (g), (m), and (n) are available for three years after the funds are appropriated. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end